Georgia, session 2025_26, HB866.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Department
of Community Health, is amended by revising Code Section 31-2-2, relating to definitions,
as follows:
"31-2-2.
As used in this chapter, the term:
H. B. 866
- 1 -

LC 57 0258
(1) 'Board' means the Board of Community Health established under Code
Section 31-2-3.
(2) 'Center' means the Rural Health System Innovation Center established under Code
Section 31-2-16 within the department's State Office of Rural Health.
(2)(3) 'Commissioner' means the commissioner of community health established under
Code Section 31-2-6.
(3)(4) 'Department' means the Department of Community Health established under Code
Section 31-2-4.
(4)(5) 'Predecessor agency or unit' means the Department of Community Health, the
Division of Public Health of the Department of Human Resources, and the Office of
Regulatory Services of the Department of Human Resources.
(5)(6) 'State health benefit plan' means the health insurance plan authorized under
Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45 and Part 6 of Article 17 of Chapter 2 of Title 20.
(6)(7) 'State Personnel Board' means the board established under Article IV, Section III
of the Constitution."
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"31-2-16.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'rural hospital organization' shall have the same
meaning as provided in Code Section 31-8-9.1.
(b) The center shall conduct a pilot program to improve the management of inpatient
insulin levels in rural hospital organizations, reduce adverse patient incidents, and provide
data on insulin management to primary care physicians upon patient discharge.
(c)(1) Consistent with the pilot program's purposes as provided for in subsection (b) of
this Code section, the center may establish a grant program to utilize and disburse
funding to rural hospital organizations and physician groups to purchase technology,
H. B. 866
- 2 -

LC 57 0258
software, and equipment to track and manage inpatient insulin levels, receive specialty
consultation and training in appropriate management of inpatient insulin levels in rural
hospital settings, and to carry out any other purpose of the pilot program.
(2) The center shall establish grant criteria and make award decisions; provided,
however, that the center shall consider the following:
(A) A high presence of diabetes in patients presenting for treatment at the rural hospital
organization;
(B) A commitment by the rural hospital organization to utilize technology enabled
tools to track inpatient insulin levels and improve precision in administering insulin;
(C) A structured partnership with a larger health system or physician practice group
with expertise in endocrinology and diabetes management to assist the rural hospital
organization in using data from technology to improve patient care; and
(D) An established plan to provide primary care physicians with data on insulin
management for their patients upon discharge to reduce hospital readmission and
improve outpatient outcomes.
(d) The pilot program established pursuant to this Code section shall be abolished and this
Code section shall stand repealed on January 1, 2027.
(e) No later than December 31, 2026, upon the receipt of data collected from the pilot
program, the center shall file a report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the House Committee on
Health, the Senate Health and Human Services Committee, the House Committee on
Appropriations, the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the Office of Health Strategy
and Coordination. Such report shall include a summary detailing the outcomes of the pilot
program and shall also be published and made available and accessible to the public."
H. B. 866
- 3 -

LC 57 0258
SECTION 3.
(a) This Act shall become effective only if funds are specifically appropriated for the
purposes of this Act in an Appropriations Act enacted by the General Assembly.
(b) If funds are so appropriated, then this Act shall become effective on the later of:
(1) The date on which such Appropriations Act becomes effective; or
(2) The beginning date of the fiscal year for which such appropriations are made.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 866
- 4 -